Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1857
Rights and remedies; how construed.

The rights and remedies given by the State Natural Gas Regulation Act shall be construed as cumulative of all other laws in force in this state relating to jurisdictional utilities and shall not repeal any other remedies or rights now existing in this state for the enforcement of the duties and obligations of jurisdictional utilities or the rights of the commission to regulate and control the same except where inconsistent with the act.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 57.